Hawaii statutes.
§346-59.4 Medical assistance to other
children. The department shall provide state-funded medical assistance, of
up to two hundred per cent of the federal poverty level for Hawaii, to persons
less than nineteen years of age who are:

(1) Legal permanent residents who arrived after
August 22, 1996;

(2) Persons who are permanently residing under color
of law; and

(3) Nonimmigrants from the Trust Territories of the
Pacific Islands who are citizens of:

(A) The Marshall Islands;

(B) The Federated States of Micronesia; or

(C) Palau,

as defined by the Compact of Free Association Act
of 1985, P.L. 99-239, or the Compact of Free Association between the United
States and the Government of Palau, P.L. 99-658,

who are otherwise eligible for benefits under the
State's medicaid program and the State's children health insurance program, but
are ineligible due to restricted eligibility rules imposed by title XXI of the
Social Security Act, the Personal Responsibility and Work [Opportunity] Reconciliation
Act of 1996, the Compact of Free Association Act of 1985, P.L. 99-239, the
Compact of Free Association between the United States and the Government of
Palau, P.L. 99-658, or any other provision of federal law denying medical
assistance to nonimmigrants who are citizens of the Marshall Islands, the
Federated States of Micronesia, or Palau. [L 2000, c 224, §2; am L 2007, c 236,
§§4, 14; am L Sp 2009, c 8, §2; am L 2015, c 20, §5]

Previous
Vol07_Ch0346-0398
Next